Illinois, session 104th, HB1387.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Sections 527A-3, 27A-4, 27A-5, 27A-10.10, and 34-18.69 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/27A-3)7    Sec. 27A-3. Definitions. For purposes of this Article:8    "At-risk pupil" means a pupil who, because of physical, 9emotional, socioeconomic, or cultural factors, is less likely 10to succeed in a conventional educational environment.11    "Authorizer" means an entity authorized under this Article 12to review applications, decide whether to approve or reject 13applications, enter into charter contracts with applicants, 14oversee charter schools, and decide whether to renew, not 15renew, or revoke a charter.16    "Governing body" means the appropriate local school 17councils established under Section 34-2.1 of this Code. 18    "Local school board" means the duly elected or appointed 19school board or board of education of a public school 20district, including special charter districts and school 21districts located in cities having a population of more than 22500,000, organized under the laws of this State.23    "School action" has the meaning given to that term in   HB1387- 2 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1Section 34-200 of this Code. 2    "State Board" means the State Board of Education.3    "Union neutrality clause" means a provision whereby a 4charter school agrees: (1) to be neutral regarding the 5unionization of any of its employees, such that the charter 6school will not at any time express a position on the matter of 7whether its employees will be unionized and such that the 8charter school will not threaten, intimidate, discriminate 9against, retaliate against, or take any adverse action against 10any employees based on their decision to support or oppose 11union representation; (2) to provide any bona fide labor 12organization access at reasonable times to areas in which the 13charter school's employees work for the purpose of meeting 14with employees to discuss their right to representation, 15employment rights under the law, and terms and conditions of 16employment; and (3) that union recognition shall be through a 17majority card check verified by a neutral third-party 18arbitrator mutually selected by the charter school and the 19bona fide labor organization through alternate striking from a 20panel of arbitrators provided by the Federal Mediation and 21Conciliation Service. As used in this definition, "bona fide 22labor organization" means a labor organization recognized 23under the National Labor Relations Act or the Illinois 24Educational Labor Relations Act. As used in this definition, 25"employees" means non-represented, non-management, and 26non-confidential employees of a charter school.   HB1387- 3 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-416, eff. 8-4-23; 2103-605, eff. 7-1-24.) 3    (105 ILCS 5/27A-4)4    Sec. 27A-4. General provisions. 5    (a) The General Assembly does not intend to alter or amend 6the provisions of any court-ordered desegregation plan in 7effect for any school district. A charter school shall be 8subject to all federal and State laws and constitutional 9provisions prohibiting discrimination on the basis of 10disability, race, creed, color, gender, national origin, 11religion, ancestry, marital status, or need for special 12education services.13    (b) The total number of charter schools operating under 14this Article at any one time shall not exceed 120. Not more 15than 70 charter schools shall operate at any one time in any 16city having a population exceeding 500,000, with at least 5 17charter schools devoted exclusively to students from 18low-performing or overcrowded schools operating at any one 19time in that city; and not more than 45 charter schools shall 20operate at any one time in the remainder of the State, with not 21more than one charter school that has been initiated by a board 22of education, or by an intergovernmental agreement between or 23among boards of education, operating at any one time in the 24school district where the charter school is located. In 25addition to these charter schools, up to but no more than 5   HB1387- 4 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1charter schools devoted exclusively to re-enrolled high school 2dropouts and/or students 16 or 15 years old at risk of dropping 3out may operate at any one time in any city having a population 4exceeding 500,000. Notwithstanding any provision to the 5contrary in subsection (b) of Section 27A-5 of this Code, each 6such dropout charter may operate up to 15 campuses within the 7city. Any of these dropout charters may have a maximum of 1,875 8enrollment seats, any one of the campuses of the dropout 9charter may have a maximum of 165 enrollment seats, and each 10campus of the dropout charter must be operated, through a 11contract or payroll, by the same legal entity as that for which 12the charter is approved and certified.13    For purposes of implementing this Section, the State Board 14shall assign a number to each charter submission it receives 15under Section 27A-6 for its review and certification, based on 16the chronological order in which the submission is received by 17it. The State Board shall promptly notify local school boards 18when the maximum numbers of certified charter schools 19authorized to operate have been reached.20    (c) No charter shall be granted under this Article that 21would convert any existing private, parochial, or non-public 22school to a charter school.23    (c-5) No charter shall be granted under this Article to an 24organization, or any of its subsidiaries, that operates a 25private, parochial, or non-public school or child care 26facility.   HB1387- 5 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    (d) Enrollment in a charter school shall be open to any 2pupil who resides within the geographic boundaries of the area 3served by the local school board, provided that the board of 4education in a city having a population exceeding 500,000 may 5designate attendance boundaries for no more than one-third of 6the charter schools permitted in the city if the board of 7education determines that attendance boundaries are needed to 8relieve overcrowding or to better serve low-income and at-risk 9students. Students residing within an attendance boundary may 10be given priority for enrollment, but must not be required to 11attend the charter school.12    (e) Nothing in this Article shall prevent 2 or more local 13school boards from jointly issuing a charter to a single 14shared charter school, provided that all of the provisions of 15this Article are met as to those local school boards.16    (f) No local school board shall require any employee of 17the school district to be employed in a charter school.18    (g) No local school board shall require any pupil residing 19within the geographic boundary of its district to enroll in a 20charter school.21    (h) If there are more eligible applicants for enrollment 22in a charter school than there are spaces available, 23successful applicants shall be selected by lottery. However, 24priority shall be given to siblings of pupils enrolled in the 25charter school and to pupils who were enrolled in the charter 26school the previous school year, unless expelled for cause,   HB1387- 6 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1and priority may be given to pupils residing within the 2charter school's attendance boundary, if a boundary has been 3designated by the board of education in a city having a 4population exceeding 500,000. 5    Any lottery required under this subsection (h) must be 6administered and videotaped by the charter school. The 7authorizer or its designee must be allowed to be present or 8view the lottery in real time. The charter school must 9maintain a videotaped record of the lottery, including a 10time/date stamp. The charter school shall transmit copies of 11the videotape and all records relating to the lottery to the 12authorizer on or before September 1 of each year. 13    Subject to the requirements for priority applicant groups 14set forth in paragraph (1) of this subsection (h), any lottery 15required under this subsection (h) must be administered in a 16way that provides each student an equal chance at admission. 17If an authorizer makes a determination that a charter school's 18lottery is in violation of this subsection (h), it may 19administer the lottery directly. After a lottery, each student 20randomly selected for admission to the charter school must be 21notified. Charter schools may not create an admissions process 22subsequent to a lottery that may operate as a barrier to 23registration or enrollment.24    Charter schools may undertake additional intake 25activities, including without limitation student essays, 26school-parent compacts, or open houses, but in no event may a   HB1387- 7 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1charter school require participation in these activities as a 2condition of enrollment. A charter school must submit an 3updated waitlist to the authorizer on a quarterly basis. A 4waitlist must be submitted to the authorizer at the same time 5as quarterly financial statements, if quarterly financial 6statements are required by the authorizer. 7    Dual enrollment at both a charter school and a public 8school or non-public school shall not be allowed. A pupil who 9is suspended or expelled from a charter school shall be deemed 10to be suspended or expelled from the public schools of the 11school district in which the pupil resides. Notwithstanding 12anything to the contrary in this subsection (h): 13        (1) any charter school with a mission exclusive to 14    educating high school dropouts may grant priority 15    admission to students who are high school dropouts and/or 16    students 16 or 15 years old at risk of dropping out and any 17    charter school with a mission exclusive to educating 18    students from low-performing or overcrowded schools may 19    restrict admission to students who are from low-performing 20    or overcrowded schools; "priority admission" for charter 21    schools exclusively devoted to re-enrolled dropouts or 22    students at risk of dropping out means a minimum of 90% of 23    students enrolled shall be high school dropouts; and24        (2) any charter school located in a school district 25    that contains all or part of a federal military base may 26    set aside up to 33% of its current charter enrollment to   HB1387- 8 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    students with parents assigned to the federal military 2    base, with the remaining 67% subject to the general 3    enrollment and lottery requirements of subsection (d) of 4    this Section and this subsection (h); if a student with a 5    parent assigned to the federal military base withdraws 6    from the charter school during the course of a school year 7    for reasons other than grade promotion, those students 8    with parents assigned to the federal military base shall 9    have preference in filling the vacancy. 10    (i) (Blank).11    (j) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 12contrary, a school district in a city having a population 13exceeding 500,000 shall not have a duty to collectively 14bargain with an exclusive representative of its employees over 15decisions to grant or deny a charter school proposal under 16Section 27A-8 of this Code, decisions to renew or revoke a 17charter under Section 27A-9 of this Code, and the impact of 18these decisions, provided that nothing in this Section shall 19have the effect of negating, abrogating, replacing, reducing, 20diminishing, or limiting in any way employee rights, 21guarantees, or privileges granted in Sections 2, 3, 7, 8, 10, 2214, and 15 of the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act.23    (k) In this Section:24    "Low-performing school" means a public school in a school 25district organized under Article 34 of this Code that enrolls 26students in any of grades kindergarten through 8 and that is   HB1387- 9 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1ranked within the lowest 10% of schools in that district in 2terms of the percentage of students meeting or exceeding 3standards on the assessments required under Section 2-3.64a-5 4of this Code.5    "Overcrowded school" means a public school in a school 6district organized under Article 34 of this Code that (i) 7enrolls students in any of grades kindergarten through 8, (ii) 8has a percentage of low-income students of 70% or more, as 9identified in the most recently available School Report Card 10published by the State Board, and (iii) is determined by the 11Chicago Board of Education to be in the most severely 12overcrowded 5% of schools in the district. On or before 13November 1 of each year, the Chicago Board of Education shall 14file a report with the State Board on which schools in the 15district meet the definition of "overcrowded school". 16"Students at risk of dropping out" means students 16 or 15 17years old in a public school in a district organized under 18Article 34 of this Code that enrolls students in any grades 199-12 who have been absent at least 90 school attendance days of 20the previous 180 school attendance days.21    (l) For advertisements created after January 1, 2015, any 22advertisement, including a radio, television, print, Internet, 23social media, or billboard advertisement, purchased by a 24school district or public school, including a charter school, 25with public funds must include a disclaimer stating that the 26advertisement was paid for using public funds.  HB1387- 10 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    This disclaimer requirement does not extend to materials 2created by the charter school, including, but not limited to, 3a school website, informational pamphlets or leaflets, or 4clothing with affixed school logos. 5(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.) 6    (105 ILCS 5/27A-5)7    (Text of Section before amendment by P.A. 102-466)8    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 9    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 10nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 11school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 12corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 13authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.14    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 15by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 16school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 17new applications to establish a charter school in a city 18having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 19charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 20does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 21before April 16, 2003.22    (b-5) (Blank). 23    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 24its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 25provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter   HB1387- 11 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 2the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 3or other governing body must include at least one parent or 4guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 5who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 6network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 7directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 8Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 9    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 10year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 11school's board of directors or other governing body shall 12complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 13leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 14familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 15responsibilities, including financial oversight and 16accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 17school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 18Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 19and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 20voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 21other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 22professional development training in these same areas. The 23training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 24a statewide charter school membership association or may be 25provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 26the State Board.   HB1387- 12 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 2health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 3requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 4preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 5students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 6prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 7school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 8requirement" does not include any course of study or 9specialized instructional requirement for which the State 10Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 11designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 12to master and apply as an outcome of their education.13    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 14health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 15under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 16promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 17non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 18school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 19than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 20school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 21requires the charter school to follow the list of all 22non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 23the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 24requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 25term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 26an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety   HB1387- 13 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1requirements in a charter school contract that are not 2contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 3including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 4authorizing local school board. 5    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 6charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 7charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 8instructional materials, and student activities.9    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 10management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 11not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 12charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 13outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 14school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 15school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 16in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 17To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 18funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 19charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 20Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 21charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 22Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 23financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 24require quarterly financial statements from each charter 25school. 26    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of   HB1387- 14 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 2all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 3schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 4of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 5exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 6governing public schools and local school board policies; 7however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:8        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 9    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 10    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer 11    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 12    for employment;13        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 14    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;15        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 16    Tort Immunity Act;17        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 18    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 19    officers, directors, employees, and agents;20        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;21        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 22    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;23        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;24        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 25    report cards;26        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;  HB1387- 15 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 2    prevention;3        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 4    discipline reporting;5        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;6        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;7        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;8        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;9        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 10        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;11        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;12        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;13        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;14        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;15        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;16        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 17        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code;18        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;19        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 20        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 21    10-20.56 of this Code; 22        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 23        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 24        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 25        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;26        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code;  HB1387- 16 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 2        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 3        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;4        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and5        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code. 6    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 7(g) is declaratory of existing law.8    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 9school district, the governing body of a State college or 10university or public community college, or any other public or 11for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 12school building and grounds or any other real property or 13facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 14for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 15maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 16activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 17to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 18Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 19district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 20use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 21services for which a charter school contracts with a school 22district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 23services for which a charter school contracts with a local 24school board or with the governing body of a State college or 25university or public community college shall be provided by 26the public entity at cost.  HB1387- 17 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 2by converting an existing school or attendance center to 3charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 4deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 5agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 6costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 7facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 8subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 9local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.10    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 11or grade level.12    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 13Board, then the charter school is its own local education 14agency. 15(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 16102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-522, eff. 178-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, eff. 12-3-21; 18102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 102-805, eff. 191-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, 20eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 21103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; revised 10-9-24.) 22    (Text of Section after amendment by P.A. 102-466)23    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 24    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian, 25nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter   HB1387- 18 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 2corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 3authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.4    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 5by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 6school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 7new applications to establish a charter school in a city 8having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 9charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 10does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 11before April 16, 2003.12    (b-5) (Blank). 13    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 14its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 15provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 16school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 17the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 18or other governing body must include at least one parent or 19guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 20who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 21network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 22directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 23Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 24    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 25year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter 26school's board of directors or other governing body shall   HB1387- 19 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 2leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 3familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 4responsibilities, including financial oversight and 5accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 6school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 7Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 8and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 9voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 10other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 11professional development training in these same areas. The 12training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 13a statewide charter school membership association or may be 14provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 15the State Board. 16    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 17health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 18requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 19preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 20students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 21prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 22school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 23requirement" does not include any course of study or 24specialized instructional requirement for which the State 25Board has established goals and learning standards or which is 26designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students   HB1387- 20 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1to master and apply as an outcome of their education.2    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 3health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 4under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 5promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 6non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 7school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 8than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 9school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 10requires the charter school to follow the list of all 11non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 12the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 13requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 14term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 15an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 16requirements in a charter school contract that are not 17contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 18including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 19authorizing local school board. 20    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 21charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 22charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 23instructional materials, and student activities.24    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 25management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but 26not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each   HB1387- 21 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 2outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 3school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 4school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 5in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 6To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 7funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 8charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 9Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 10charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 11Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 12financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 13require quarterly financial statements from each charter 14school. A charter school shall spend no less than 90% of its 15budget on direct-service costs for students. 16    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 17this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 18all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 19schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 20of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 21exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 22governing public schools and local school board policies; 23however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:24        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 25    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 26    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer   HB1387- 22 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 2    for employment;3        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 4    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;5        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 6    Tort Immunity Act;7        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 8    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 9    officers, directors, employees, and agents;10        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;11        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 12    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;13        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;14        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 15    report cards;16        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;17        (9) Section 27-23.7 of this Code regarding bullying 18    prevention;19        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 20    discipline reporting;21        (11) Sections 22-80 and 27-8.1 of this Code;22        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;23        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;24        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;25        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 26        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;  HB1387- 23 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;2        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;3        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;4        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;5        (21) Section 27-9.1a of this Code;6        (22) Section 27-9.1b of this Code; 7        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code; 8        (24) Article 26A of this Code;9        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;10        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 11        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 12    10-20.56 of this Code; 13        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 14        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 15        (30) Section 28-19.2 of this Code; 16        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;17        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code; 18        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 19        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 20        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;21        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; and22        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code. 23    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 24(g) is declaratory of existing law.25    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 26school district, the governing body of a State college or   HB1387- 24 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1university or public community college, or any other public or 2for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 3school building and grounds or any other real property or 4facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 5for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 6maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 7activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 8to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 9Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 10district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 11use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 12services for which a charter school contracts with a school 13district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 14services for which a charter school contracts with a local 15school board or with the governing body of a State college or 16university or public community college shall be provided by 17the public entity at cost.18    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 19by converting an existing school or attendance center to 20charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 21deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 22agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 23costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 24facilities that are used by the charter school shall be 25subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 26local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.  HB1387- 25 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 2or grade level.3    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 4Board, then the charter school is its own local education 5agency. 6(Source: P.A. 102-51, eff. 7-9-21; 102-157, eff. 7-1-22; 7102-360, eff. 1-1-22; 102-445, eff. 8-20-21; 102-466, eff. 87-1-25; 102-522, eff. 8-20-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-676, 9eff. 12-3-21; 102-697, eff. 4-5-22; 102-702, eff. 7-1-23; 10102-805, eff. 1-1-23; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-154, eff. 116-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, 12eff. 7-1-24; 103-641, eff. 7-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; 13revised 11-26-24.) 14    (105 ILCS 5/27A-10.10)15    Sec. 27A-10.10. School transition plans; school action 16public meetings and hearings. Closure of charter school; 17unspent public funds; procedures for the disposition of 18property and assets.19    (a) If a local school board approves a school action, the 20governing body of the charter school shall work 21collaboratively with local school educators and families of 22students attending a charter school that is the subject of a 23school action to ensure successful integration of affected 24students into new learning environments. For a charter school 25closure, the governing body of charter school shall ensure   HB1387- 26 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1that all students of the charter school at the time of the 2closure will be guaranteed a seat at a receiving school, and 3shall ensure that all teachers of the charter school at the 4time of the closure will be guaranteed a job at a receiving 5school. Upon the closing of a charter school authorized by one 6or more local school boards, the governing body of the charter 7school or its designee shall refund to the chartering entity 8or entities all unspent public funds. The charter school's 9other property and assets shall be disposed of under the 10provisions of the charter application and contract. If the 11application and contract are silent or ambiguous as to the 12disposition of any of the school's property or assets, any 13property or assets of the charter school purchased with public 14funds shall be returned to the school district or districts 15from which the charter school draws enrollment, at no cost to 16the receiving district or districts, subject to each 17district's acceptance of the property or asset. Any unspent 18public funds or other property or assets received by the 19charter school directly from any State or federal agency shall 20be refunded to or revert back to that State or federal agency, 21respectively.22    (b) The governing body of the charter school shall prepare 23and implement a school transition plan to support students 24attending a charter school that is the subject of a school 25action that accomplishes the goals of this Section. The 26governing body must identify and commit specific resources for   HB1387- 27 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1implementation of the school transition plan for a minimum of 2the full first academic year after the local school board 3approves a school action. Upon the closing of a charter school 4authorized by the State Board, the governing body of the 5charter school or its designee shall refund all unspent public 6funds to the State Board. The charter school's other property 7and assets shall be disposed of under the provisions of the 8charter application and contract. If the application and 9contract are silent or ambiguous as to the disposition of any 10of the school's property or assets, any property or assets of 11the charter school purchased with public funds shall be 12returned to the school district or districts from which the 13charter school draws its enrollment, at no cost to the 14receiving district or districts, subject to each district's 15acceptance of the property or asset. Any unspent public funds 16or other property or assets provided by a State agency other 17than the State Board or by a federal agency shall be refunded 18to or revert back to that State or federal agency, 19respectively.20    (c) The school transition plan shall include the 21following: If a determination is made to close a charter 22school located within the boundaries of a school district 23organized under Article 34 of this Code for at least one school 24year, the charter school shall give at least 60 days' notice of 25the closure to all affected students and parents or legal 26guardians.  HB1387- 28 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1        (1) services to support the academic, social, and 2    emotional needs of students; services to support students 3    with disabilities, homeless students, and English language 4    learners; and services to address security and safety 5    issues; 6        (2) options to enroll in higher performing schools; 7        (3) informational briefings regarding the choice of 8    schools which include all pertinent information to enable 9    the parent or guardian and child to make an informed 10    choice, including the option to visit the schools of 11    choice prior to making a decision; 12        (4) the provision of appropriate transportation if 13    practicable; 14        (5) the departments that are responsible for the 15    oversight; 16        (6) specific programs to be offered; and 17        (7) support to implement plans at receiving schools, 18    specifying the funding source. 19    (d) When implementing a school action, the local school 20board must make reasonable and demonstrated efforts to ensure 21that: 22        (1) affected students receive a level of social 23    support service that is comparable to the level of social 24    support service available at the previous school, as long 25    as the need for social support service continues to exist; 26    and   HB1387- 29 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1        (2) class sizes of any receiving school do not exceed 2    those established under the class size policy of the 3    charter school that is the subject of a school action, 4    subject to principal discretion. 5    (e) By October 1 of each year, the governing body of the 6charter school shall prepare and publish school action 7guidelines, which shall outline the academic and non-academic 8criteria for school action and shall be created with the 9involvement of local school councils, parents, educators, and 10community organizations. The guidelines, and each subsequent 11revision to the guidelines, shall be subject to a public 12comment period of at least 21 days before their approval. 13    (f) By December 1 of each year, the governing body of the 14charter school shall announce all proposed school actions to 15be taken at the close of the current academic year consistent 16with the guidelines. 17    (g) By December 1 of each year, the governing body of the 18charter school shall publish notice of the proposed school 19actions. 20        (1) Notice of the proposal for a school action shall 21    include a written statement of the basis for the school 22    action, an explanation of how the school action meets the 23    criteria set forth in the guidelines, and a draft School 24    Transition Plan identifying the items required in this 25    Section for all charter schools affected by the school 26    action. The notice shall state the date, time, and place   HB1387- 30 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    of the hearing or meeting. For a charter school closure 2    only, 8 months after notice is given, the governing body 3    of the charter school must publish on the district's 4    website a full financial report on the closure, which 5    includes an analysis of the closure's costs and benefits 6    to the district. 7        (2) The governing body of the charter school shall 8    provide notice to the principal, staff, local school 9    council, and parents or guardians of any charter school 10    student that is subject to the proposed school action. 11        (3) The governing body of the charter school shall 12    provide written notice of any proposed school action to 13    the State Senator, State Representative, and alderperson 14    for the charter school or charter schools that are subject 15    to the proposed school action. 16        (4) The governing body of the charter school shall 17    publish notice of proposed school actions on the 18    district's Internet website. 19        (5) The governing body of the charter school shall 20    provide notice of proposed school actions at least 30 21    calendar days in advance of a public hearing or meeting. 22    The notice shall state the date, time, and place of the 23    hearing or meeting. No local school board decision 24    regarding a proposed school action may take place less 25    than 60 days after the announcement of the proposed school 26    action.   HB1387- 31 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    (h) The governing body of the charter school shall publish 2a brief summary of the proposed school actions and the date, 3time, and place of the hearings or meetings in a newspaper of 4general circulation. 5    (i) The governing body of the charter school shall 6designate at least 3 opportunities to elicit public comment at 7a hearing or meeting on a proposed school action and shall 8convene: 9        (1) at least one public hearing at the centrally 10    located office of the local school board; and 11        (2) at least 2 additional public hearings or meetings 12    at a location convenient to the school community subject 13    to the proposed school action. 14    (j) Public hearings shall be conducted by a qualified 15independent hearing officer chosen from a list of independent 16hearing officers. The general counsel of the charter school 17shall compile and publish a list of independent hearing 18officers by November 1 of each school year. The independent 19hearing officer: 20        (1) must be a licensed attorney eligible to practice 21    law in Illinois; 22        (2) must not be an employee of the local school board; 23    and 24        (3) must not have, within the last year, represented 25    in any capacity the local school board, its employees or 26    any labor organization representing its employees; any   HB1387- 32 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1    local school council; or any charter or contract school. 2    The independent hearing officer shall issue a written 3report that summarizes the hearing and determines whether the 4governing body of the charter school complied with the 5requirements of this Section and the guidelines developed 6under this Section. 7    The governing body of the charter school shall publish the 8report on the district's Internet website within 5 calendar 9days after receiving the report and at least 15 days before any 10local school board action being taken. 11    (k) Public meetings shall be conducted by a representative 12of the governing body of the charter school. A summary of the 13public meeting shall be published on the district's Internet 14website within 5 calendar days after the meeting. 15    (l) If the governing body of the charter school proposes a 16school action without following the mandates set forth in this 17Section, the proposed school action shall not be approved by 18the local school board during the school year in which the 19school action was proposed. 20(Source: P.A. 103-175, eff. 6-30-23.) 21    (105 ILCS 5/34-18.69)22    Sec. 34-18.69. Moratorium on school closings, 23consolidations, and phase-outs. The Board shall not approve 24any school closings, consolidations, or phase-outs, including 25charter school campuses or networks during the term of a   HB1387- 33 -LRB104 05820 LNS 15851 b1contract, until the Board of Education is seated on January 215, 2025. Nothing in this Section shall prevent a school 3district from not renewing a charter school's contract upon 4its expiration. 5(Source: P.A. 102-177, eff. 12-17-21 (See Section 15 of P.A. 6102-691 for the effective date of P.A. 102-177).) 7    Section 95. No acceleration or delay. Where this Act makes 8changes in a statute that is represented in this Act by text 9that is not yet or no longer in effect (for example, a Section 10represented by multiple versions), the use of that text does 11not accelerate or delay the taking effect of (i) the changes 12made by this Act or (ii) provisions derived from any other 13Public Act.